src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON MARJA-sur !!= @CODE@ Surnames
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>                MARJADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ;

!!€gt-norm: Skálltje # Even-syllable test
!!€ Skálltje:               Skálltje+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom
!!€ Skálltjáj:              Skálltje+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill
!!€ Skáltjes:              Skálltje+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela

!LEXICON MARJA-U-sur !!= @CODE@ Surnames ending on u. Presently not used in SMJ.
!                            +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>                MARJADECL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ;

!LEXICON MARJA-I-sur !!= @CODE@ Surnames ending on i. Presently not used in SMJ.
!                            +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>                MARJADECL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ;

!LEXICON MARJA-A-sur !!= @CODE@ Surnames ending on a. Presently not used in SMJ.
!                            +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>                MARJADECL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ;

!LEXICON MARJA-LOAN-plc !!= @CODE@ Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill change (place names). Presently not used in SMJ.
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc@U.Cap.Obl@:%>00@U.Cap.Obl@ MARJA-LOAN-DC ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:%>Q1@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;

LEXICON MARJA-plc-der !!= @CODE@ = place name derivations and corresponding flag. Presently not used in SMJ.
 @U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;

LEXICON SUOBMA-plc !!= @CODE@ Placenames. Like MARJA but no derivation
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> SUOBMADECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Suobma # Even-syllable test
!!€ Suobma:               Suobma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Suobmaj:              Suobma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!€ Suomas:              Suobma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela

LEXICON SUOBMADECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ MARJA-DC ;

LEXICON MARJADECL-ORG ! Vowel-final names with Gradation and Ill change (person names)
 @U.Cap.Obl@ MARJA-DC-ORG ;

LEXICON MARJADECL-PLC ! Vowel-final names with Gradation and Ill change (person names)
 @U.Cap.Obl@ MARJA-DC ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ ;

LEXICON MARJADECL ! Vowel-final names with Gradation and Ill change (person names)
 @U.Cap.Obl@ MARJA-DC ;


LEXICON MARJA-DC
 +Sg+Nom:       K     ;
 +Sg+Nom:       RHyph ;
    +Ess:n      K     ;
 +Sg+Ill:X4j    K     ;
 +Sg+Gen:Q1     K     ;
 +Sg+Gen:Q1     RHyph ;
 +Sg+Acc:Q1v    K     ;
 +Sg+Ine:Q1n    K     ;
 +Sg+Ela:Q1s    K     ;
 +Pl+Nom:Q1     K     ;
 +Pl+Gen:Q1j    K     ;
 +Pl+Gen:Q1j    RHyph ;
 +Pl+Acc:Q1jt   K     ;
 +Pl+Ill:Q1jda  K     ;
 +Pl+Ine:Q1jn   K     ;
 +Pl+Ela:Q1js   K     ;
 +Pl+Com:Q1j    K     ;
 +Sg+Com:Q1X5jn K     ;

LEXICON MARJA-DC-ORG
 +Sg+Nom:       K     ;
 +Sg+Nom:       RHyph ;
    +Ess:n      K     ;
 +Sg+Ill:X4j    K     ;
 +Sg+Gen:Q1     K     ;
 +Sg+Gen:Q1     RHyph ;
 +Sg+Acc:Q1v    K     ;
 +Sg+Ine:Q1n    K     ;
 +Sg+Ela:Q1s    K     ;
! +Pl+Nom:Q1 K ;
! +Pl+Gen:Q1j K ;
! +Pl+Gen:Q1j RHyph ;
! +Pl+Acc:Q1jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:Q1jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:Q1jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:Q1js K ;
! +Pl+Com:Q1j K ;
 +Sg+Com:Q1X5jn K     ;


LEXICON MARJA-LOAN-DC
         +Sg+Nom:       K     ;
         +Sg+Nom:       RHyph ;
    +Ess+Err/Orth:n      K     ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:X4j    K     ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:Q1     K     ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:Q1     RHyph ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:Q1v    K     ;
 +Sg+Ine+Err/Orth:Q1n    K     ;
 +Sg+Ela+Err/Orth:Q1s    K     ;
! +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:Q1 K ;
! +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:Q1j K ;
! +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:Q1j RHyph ;
! +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:Q1jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:Q1jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine+Err/Orth:Q1jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela+Err/Orth:Q1js K ;
! +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:Q1j K ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:Q1X5jn K     ;

LEXICON DiminutiveEVEN
@U.Cap.Obl@ DiminutiveEVENDECL   ;

LEXICON DiminutiveEVENDECL
                           +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Prop:X7sj        N-ODDCASE    ;
                           +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Prop:X7tj        OTH-ODDCASE  ;
   +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Prop+Sg+Nom:X7tja»sj    K            ;
          +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Prop:X7tja»dtja  GÅNÅGIS-EVEN ;

LEXICON DiminutiveODD
@U.Cap.Obl@ DiminutiveODD  ;

LEXICON DiminutiveODDDECL
                    +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom:asj          K            ;
                           +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:adtja        GÅNÅGIS-EVEN ;
          +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:adtja»X7sj   N-ODDCASE    ;
          +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:adtja»X7tj   OTH-ODDCASE  ;

!LEXICON JAVRRIE-plc !!= @CODE@  Placenames. This is a lex for Umesami names on -ie that have CG
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: JAVRRIEDECL ;

!LEXICON JAVRRIEDECL
! @U.Cap.Obl@ JAVRRIE-DC ;

!LEXICON JAVRRIE-DC
! +Sg+Nom:i%>e      K     ;
! +Sg+Nom:i%>e      RHyph ;
!    +Ess:i%>en     K     ;
! +Sg+Ill:á%>X4j    K     ;
! +Sg+Gen:i%>Q1e    K     ;
! +Sg+Gen:i%>Q1e    RHyph ;
! +Sg+Acc:i%>Q1ev   K     ;
! +Sg+Ine:i%>Q1en   K     ;
! +Sg+Ela:i%>Q1es   K     ;
! +Pl+Nom:i%>Q1e    K     ;
! +Pl+Gen:i%>Q1j    K     ;
! +Pl+Gen:i%>Q1j    RHyph ;
! +Pl+Acc:i%>Q1jt   K     ;
! +Pl+Ill:i%>Q1jda  K     ;
! +Pl+Ine:i%>Q1jn   K     ;
! +Pl+Ela:i%>Q1js   K     ;
! +Pl+Com:i%>Q1j    K     ;
! +Sg+Com:i%>Q1X5jn K     ;


!LEXICON NIKOSIIJA-plc !XXX Check.
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> NIKOSIIJADECL ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj@U.Cap.Opt@:%>@U.Cap.Opt@laddj DEARVVASLAS ;	!SUB
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Attr@U.Cap.Opt@:%>@U.Cap.Opt@laddj ATTR ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A@U.Cap.Opt@:%>@U.Cap.Opt@laddj JOHTOLAT ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A@U.Cap.Opt@:%>@U.Cap.Opt@laddja ISSORASSA- ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom@U.Cap.Opt@:%>@U.Cap.Opt@laddja PxV ; ! tentative.
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Ess@U.Cap.Opt@:%>@U.Cap.Opt@laddjan K ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Ess@U.Cap.Opt@:%>@U.Cap.Opt@laddjan PxC ; ! tentative, check.
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A@U.Cap.Opt@:%>@U.Cap.Opt@laddja EABBUCASE2 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;

!LEXICON NIKOSIIJADECL !Names with ending -iija, a-illative
!ACCRA-DC_PLC-ORG ;

!! 4-syllable stems

!! Words in lexicon BASUDIS are 4-syllable, end on conconant and have cg. Even syllable case marking with acc -av, ill -aj, ela -as, etc. Real lule sami stems.

LEXICON BASUDIS-org!!= @CODE@  Only singular. Placenames
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> BASUDISDECL-ORG ;

!!€gt-norm: Ádjagas # 4-syllable test
!!€ Ádjagas:                 Ádjagas+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom
!!€ Ádjagassaj:              Ádjagas+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill
!!€ Ádjagasás:               Ádjagas+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela

LEXICON BASUDIS-mal !!= @CODE@  Male names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%> BASUDISDECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Ájluhasj # 4-syllable test
!!€ Ájluhasj:                 Ájluhasj+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom
!!€ Ájluhadtjaj:              Ájluhasj+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill !should add dummy to prevent unusual dtj-stem?
!!€ Ájluhattjas:              Ájluhasj+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela

LEXICON BASUDIS-fem !!= @CODE@ Female names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%> BASUDISDECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Magdalas # 4-syllable test
!!€ Magdalas:                Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom
!!€ Magdalassaj:              Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill
!!€ Magdalasás:               Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela

!LEXICON BASUDIS-sur !!= @CODE@ Surnames. Presently not used in SMJ.
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> BASUDISDECL ;

LEXICON BASUDIS-plc !!= @CODE@ Place names
                   +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>                 BASUDISDECL-PLC ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:%>aQ100@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK          ;

!!€gt-norm: Ulldevis # 4-syllable test
!!€ Ulldevis:                 Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Ulldevissaj:              Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!€ Ulldevisás:               Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela

!LEXICON BASUDIS-obj
! +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> BASUDISDECL ;

LEXICON BASUDISDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ BASUDISUCASE ;

LEXICON BASUDISDECL-PLC
 @U.Cap.Obl@ BASUDISUCASE ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@+Err/Orth:@U.Cap.Opt@  LASJ;

LEXICON BASUDISDECL-ORG
 @U.Cap.Obl@ BASUDISUCASE-ORG ;
