src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Anndaris:Anndariss BASUDIS-mal ;
Basudis:Basudiss BASUDIS-plc ; !village
Billdo MARJA-sur ;
Birtsse MARJA-sur ;
Duolljá MARJA-sur ;
Dálvvadis:Dálvvadiss BASUDIS-plc ; !village
Eberjja MARJA-sur ;
Gisuris:Gisuriss BASUDIS-plc ;
Jellerstæhtta:Jeller^stæhtta MARJA-sur ;
Lárs-Ánndaris:Lárs-Ánndariss BASUDIS-mal ;
Magdalas:Magdalass BASUDIS-fem ;
Magdalas:Magdalass BASUDIS-fem ;
Nils-Anndaris:Nils-Anndariss BASUDIS-mal ;
Párkka MARJA-sur ;
Renmánne:Ren^mán'ne MARJA-sur ;
Ruossja+CmpN/SgG:Ruos'sja SUOBMA-plc ; !
Sjuhtjunis:Sjuhtjuniss BASUDIS-plc ;
Skálltje MARJA-sur ; !village
Stuor-Anndaris:Stuor-Anndariss BASUDIS-mal ;
Stuor-Ánndaris:Stuor-Ánndariss BASUDIS-mal ;
Suobma+CmpN/SgG:Suobma SUOBMA-plc; !
Sábme+CmpN/SgG:Sábme SUOBMA-plc; !
Ulldevis:Ulldeviss BASUDIS-plc ;
Ájluhasj:Ájluhadtj BASUDIS-mal ;
Ánndaris:Ánndariss BASUDIS-mal ;
Čohkkiras:Čohkkirass BASUDIS-plc ;
Goabddális:Goabddáliss BASUDIS-plc ; !village
Miergenis:Miergeniss BASUDIS-plc ; !village
